Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1193.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 64e. (1) The department, in consultation with the safety and wellness committee, shall develop a placement plan for therapeutic and de-escalation spaces within all prisons to replace solitary confinement. If the director determines a qualified prisoner has a well-established and documented pattern of physically assaultive behavior as described in section 64a(4), the qualified prisoner's placement in solitary confinement must be in a therapeutic space as described in this section and as defined in section 64a. A qualified prisoner who is confined in restrictive housing must receive not less than 8 hours each day of meaningful out-of-cell time, including opportunities for congregate engagement, therapeutic programming, recreation, phone calls or video communication, visitation, rehabilitative services, and other structured human interaction intended to reduce the harms associated with isolation. Individuals must maintain access to standard store orders and the ability to order a standard number of SecurePak items. The bureau of health care services, in consultation with trauma-specific mental health treatment experts in neuroscience, psychology, psychiatry, and social work, and members from the safety and wellness committee, shall create written policies and procedures for the implementation and use of therapeutic spaces. The policies and procedures under this section must include, but not be limited to, requiring the following standards unless a prisoner's individual treatment plan directs otherwise: (a) Temperature-controlled cells between 65 and 76 degrees Fahrenheit. (b) Wall art, murals, or other visual elements that enhance a positive environment. (c) Integrated sensory activity, including, but not limited to, art, writing materials, music, puzzles, or other sensory appropriate items. (d) Extended outside time with activities, including, but not limited to, gardening, sports equipment, and sensory integrated mechanisms. (e) Exercise opportunities, including the use of equipment. (f) Tablet access with programming that promotes social and mental well-being. (g) Television access that provides pre-uploaded programs, including closed-circuit television. (h) Activities outlined through written person-centered planning. (2) The safety and wellness committee is created in the department. The committee shall hold its first meeting not later than 120 days after the effective date the amendatory act that added this section and must meet at least once a month. The committee must consist of the following members: (a) Not fewer than 2 members appointed by the governor who are family members of a prisoner under the jurisdiction of the department and are directly impacted by a family member's solitary confinement, not from the same family. These members may include a prisoner's observation aide. (b) Two members appointed by the governor from disability or mental health organizations, one of which has the right to complete investigations, file complaints, and access the prisons to investigate. (c) The legislative corrections ombudsman or a representative from the office. (d) One member appointed by the governor from a list of 3 selected by the senate majority leader. (e) One member appointed by the governor from a list of 3 selected by the senate minority leader. (f) One member appointed by the governor from a list of 3 selected by the speaker of the house of representatives. (g) One member appointed by the governor from a list of 3 selected by the minority leader of the house of representatives. (h) One member appointed by the governor who is a psychiatrist as that term is defined in section 100c of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100c, or psychiatric nurse practitioner. (i) One member appointed by the governor who is a licensed psychologist or a licensed master's social worker as those terms are defined in section 100b of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100b, who has training and expertise dealing with mental health issues and experience working with formerly or currently incarcerated individuals. (j) One member appointed by the governor who is a physician as that term is defined in section 100c of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100c, or physician's assistant licensed or otherwise authorized under part 170 or 175 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17001 to 333.17097 and 333.17501 to 333.17556. (k) Not fewer than 2 members appointed by the governor who have experienced solitary confinement as a prisoner. One member under this subdivision must have been in a men's facility. One member under this subdivision must have been in a women's facility. (l) A member appointed by the governor who is from an organization that is an expert in trauma-informed care and treatment. (m) Two members appointed by the governor from organizations who advocate on behalf of the incarcerated. (n) Two members appointed by the governor who are employees of the department. One of the members must be a directly impacted mental health worker who advocates on behalf of the incarcerated population. (3) The safety and wellness committee created under subsection (2) shall do all of the following: (a) Assist the department in developing a placement plan for therapeutic and de-escalation spaces under subsection (1). (b) Review the overall assessment of the culture of the prison, including improving de-escalation and minimizing solitary confinement use. (c) Have access of individuals subject to extended placement under section 64a and the facilities where the individuals are confined. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 1192 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.